Illinois, session 104th, HB1049.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-501 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-501)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-501)7    Sec. 11-501. Driving while under the influence of alcohol, 8other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 9combination thereof. 10    (a) A person shall not drive or be in actual physical 11control of any vehicle within this State while:12        (1) the alcohol concentration in the person's blood, 13    other bodily substance, or breath is 0.08 or more based on 14    the definition of blood and breath units in Section 15    11-501.2;16        (2) under the influence of alcohol;17        (3) under the influence of any intoxicating compound 18    or combination of intoxicating compounds to a degree that 19    renders the person incapable of driving safely;20        (4) under the influence of any other drug or 21    combination of drugs to a degree that renders the person 22    incapable of safely driving;23        (5) under the combined influence of alcohol, other   HB1049- 2 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1    drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds to a 2    degree that renders the person incapable of safely 3    driving;4        (6) there is any amount of a drug, substance, or 5    compound in the person's breath, blood, other bodily 6    substance, or urine resulting from the unlawful use or 7    consumption of a controlled substance listed in the 8    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating 9    compound listed in the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, 10    or methamphetamine as listed in the Methamphetamine 11    Control and Community Protection Act; or12        (7) the person has, within 2 hours of driving or being 13    in actual physical control of a vehicle, a 14    tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in the person's whole 15    blood or other bodily substance as defined in paragraph 6 16    of subsection (a) of Section 11-501.2 of this Code. 17    Subject to all other requirements and provisions under 18    this Section, this paragraph (7) does not apply to the 19    lawful consumption of cannabis by a qualifying patient 20    licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 21    Program Act who is in possession of a valid registry card 22    issued under that Act, unless that person is impaired by 23    the use of cannabis.24    (b) The fact that any person charged with violating this 25Section is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol, 26cannabis under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis   HB1049- 3 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1Program Act, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 2compounds, or any combination thereof, shall not constitute a 3defense against any charge of violating this Section.4    (c) Penalties.5        (1) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, any 6    person convicted of violating subsection (a) of this 7    Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.8        (2) A person who violates subsection (a) or a similar 9    provision a second time shall be sentenced to a mandatory 10    minimum term of either 5 days of imprisonment or 240 hours 11    of community service in addition to any other criminal or 12    administrative sanction.13        (3) A person who violates subsection (a) is subject to 14    6 months of imprisonment, an additional mandatory minimum 15    fine of $1,000, and 25 days of community service in a 16    program benefiting children if the person was transporting 17    a person under the age of 16 at the time of the violation.18        (4) A person who violates subsection (a) a first time, 19    if the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, breath, 20    other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more based on 21    the definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, 22    or urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 23    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 24    mandatory minimum of 100 hours of community service and a 25    mandatory minimum fine of $500.26        (5) A person who violates subsection (a) a second   HB1049- 4 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1    time, if at the time of the second violation the alcohol 2    concentration in his or her blood, breath, other bodily 3    substance, or urine was 0.16 or more based on the 4    definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 5    urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 6    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 7    mandatory minimum of 2 days of imprisonment and a 8    mandatory minimum fine of $1,250.9    (d) Aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, 10other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or 11any combination thereof. 12        (1) Every person convicted of committing a violation 13    of this Section shall be guilty of aggravated driving 14    under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 15    intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination 16    thereof if:17            (A) the person committed a violation of subsection 18        (a) or a similar provision for the third or subsequent 19        time;20            (B) the person committed a violation of subsection 21        (a) while driving a school bus with one or more 22        passengers on board;23            (C) the person in committing a violation of 24        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 25        that resulted in great bodily harm or permanent 26        disability or disfigurement to another, when the   HB1049- 5 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        violation was a proximate cause of the injuries;2            (D) the person committed a violation of subsection 3        (a) and has been previously convicted of violating 4        Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 5        Criminal Code of 2012 or a similar provision of a law 6        of another state relating to reckless homicide in 7        which the person was determined to have been under the 8        influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 9        intoxicating compound or compounds as an element of 10        the offense or the person has previously been 11        convicted under subparagraph (C) or subparagraph (F) 12        of this paragraph (1);13            (E) the person, in committing a violation of 14        subsection (a) while driving at any speed in a school 15        speed zone at a time when a speed limit of 20 miles per 16        hour was in effect under subsection (a) of Section 17        11-605 of this Code, was involved in a motor vehicle 18        crash that resulted in bodily harm, other than great 19        bodily harm or permanent disability or disfigurement, 20        to another person, when the violation of subsection 21        (a) was a proximate cause of the bodily harm;22            (F) the person, in committing a violation of 23        subsection (a), was involved in a motor vehicle crash 24        or snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle, or watercraft 25        accident that resulted in the death of another person, 26        when the violation of subsection (a) was a proximate   HB1049- 6 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        cause of the death;2            (G) the person committed a violation of subsection 3        (a) during a period in which the defendant's driving 4        privileges are revoked or suspended, where the 5        revocation or suspension was for a violation of 6        subsection (a) or a similar provision, Section 7        11-501.1, paragraph (b) of Section 11-401, or for 8        reckless homicide as defined in Section 9-3 of the 9        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;10            (H) the person committed the violation while he or 11        she did not possess a driver's license or permit or a 12        restricted driving permit or a judicial driving permit 13        or a monitoring device driving permit;14            (I) the person committed the violation while he or 15        she knew or should have known that the vehicle he or 16        she was driving was not covered by a liability 17        insurance policy;18            (J) the person in committing a violation of 19        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 20        that resulted in bodily harm, but not great bodily 21        harm, to the child under the age of 16 being 22        transported by the person, if the violation was the 23        proximate cause of the injury; 24            (K) the person in committing a second violation of 25        subsection (a) or a similar provision was transporting 26        a person under the age of 16; or  HB1049- 7 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1            (L) the person committed a violation of subsection 2        (a) of this Section while transporting one or more 3        passengers in a vehicle for-hire. 4        (2)(A) Except as provided otherwise, a person 5    convicted of aggravated driving under the influence of 6    alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 7    compounds, or any combination thereof is guilty of a Class 8    4 felony.9        (B) A third violation of this Section or a similar 10    provision is a Class 2 felony. If at the time of the third 11    violation the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, 12    breath, other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more 13    based on the definition of blood, breath, other bodily 14    substance, or urine units in Section 11-501.2, a mandatory 15    minimum of 90 days of imprisonment and a mandatory minimum 16    fine of $2,500 shall be imposed in addition to any other 17    criminal or administrative sanction. If at the time of the 18    third violation, the defendant was transporting a person 19    under the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 20    days of community service in a program benefiting children 21    shall be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 22    administrative sanction.23        (C) A fourth violation of this Section or a similar 24    provision is a Class 2 felony, for which a sentence of 25    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 26    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in   HB1049- 8 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 2    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 3    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 4    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 5    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 6    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fourth 7    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 8    the age of 16 a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of 9    community service in a program benefiting children shall 10    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 11    administrative sanction.12        (D) A fifth violation of this Section or a similar 13    provision is a Class 1 felony, for which a sentence of 14    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 15    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in 16    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 17    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 18    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 19    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 20    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 21    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fifth 22    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 23    the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000, and 25 days of 24    community service in a program benefiting children shall 25    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 26    administrative sanction.  HB1049- 9 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        (E) A sixth or subsequent violation of this Section or 2    similar provision is a Class X felony. If at the time of 3    the violation, the alcohol concentration in the 4    defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 5    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 6    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 7    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 8    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 9    administrative sanction. If at the time of the violation, 10    the defendant was transporting a person under the age of 11    16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of community 12    service in a program benefiting children shall be imposed 13    in addition to any other criminal or administrative 14    sanction.15        (F) For a violation of subparagraph (C) of paragraph 16    (1) of this subsection (d), the defendant, if sentenced to 17    a term of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to not less 18    than one year nor more than 12 years.19        (G) A violation of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) 20    of this subsection (d) is a Class 2 felony, for which the 21    defendant, unless the court determines that extraordinary 22    circumstances exist and require probation, shall be 23    sentenced to: (i) a term of imprisonment of not less than 3 24    years and not more than 14 years if the violation resulted 25    in the death of one person; or (ii) a term of imprisonment 26    of not less than 6 years and not more than 28 years if the   HB1049- 10 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1    violation resulted in the deaths of 2 or more persons. The 2    defendant shall also be responsible to make child support 3    payments as determined by the court under Section 520 of 4    the Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act for 5    the minor child or children of any person or persons whose 6    deaths resulted from the violation. 7        (H) For a violation of subparagraph (J) of paragraph 8    (1) of this subsection (d), a mandatory fine of $2,500, 9    and 25 days of community service in a program benefiting 10    children shall be imposed in addition to any other 11    criminal or administrative sanction.12        (I) A violation of subparagraph (K) of paragraph (1) 13    of this subsection (d), is a Class 2 felony and a mandatory 14    fine of $2,500, and 25 days of community service in a 15    program benefiting children shall be imposed in addition 16    to any other criminal or administrative sanction. If the 17    child being transported suffered bodily harm, but not 18    great bodily harm, in a motor vehicle crash, and the 19    violation was the proximate cause of that injury, a 20    mandatory fine of $5,000 and 25 days of community service 21    in a program benefiting children shall be imposed in 22    addition to any other criminal or administrative sanction.23        (J) A violation of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) 24    of this subsection (d) is a Class 3 felony, for which a 25    sentence of probation or conditional discharge may not be 26    imposed.   HB1049- 11 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        (3) Any person sentenced under this subsection (d) who 2    receives a term of probation or conditional discharge must 3    serve a minimum term of either 480 hours of community 4    service or 10 days of imprisonment as a condition of the 5    probation or conditional discharge in addition to any 6    other criminal or administrative sanction.7    (e) Any reference to a prior violation of subsection (a) 8or a similar provision includes any violation of a provision 9of a local ordinance or a provision of a law of another state 10or an offense committed on a military installation that is 11similar to a violation of subsection (a) of this Section.12    (f) The imposition of a mandatory term of imprisonment or 13assignment of community service for a violation of this 14Section shall not be suspended or reduced by the court.15    (g) Any penalty imposed for driving with a license that 16has been revoked for a previous violation of subsection (a) of 17this Section shall be in addition to the penalty imposed for 18any subsequent violation of subsection (a).19    (h) For any prosecution under this Section, a certified 20copy of the driving abstract of the defendant shall be 21admitted as proof of any prior conviction. 22(Source: P.A. 101-363, eff. 8-9-19; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 23    Section 10. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 24Marriage Act is amended by adding Section 520 as follows:   HB1049- 12 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1    (750 ILCS 5/520 new)2    Sec. 520. Child support for aggravated driving under the 3influence.4    (a) If a defendant is found guilty of aggravated driving 5under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 6intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination thereof 7under subparagraph (f) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of 8Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code where the 9violation has resulted in the death of another, the court 10shall order the defendant to pay an amount reasonable and 11necessary for support of the minor child or children of any 12victims. As used in this Section, "child" includes any child 13under age 18 and any child age 19 or younger who is still 14attending high school.15        (1) Computation of basic child support obligation. The 16    court shall compute the basic child support obligation by 17    taking the following steps:18            (A) determine the defendant's monthly net income;19            (B) add the defendant and surviving parent's 20        monthly net incomes together to determine the combined 21        monthly net income;22            (C) select the corresponding appropriate amount 23        from the schedule of basic child support obligation 24        based on the parties' combined monthly net income and 25        number of children; and26            (D) calculate each party's percentage share of the   HB1049- 13 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        basic child support obligation.2        (2) Duty of support. The court shall determine child 3    support in each case by applying the child support 4    guidelines unless the court makes a finding that 5    application of the guidelines would be inappropriate, 6    after considering the best interests of the child and 7    evidence which shows relevant factors including, but not 8    limited to, one or more of the following:9            (A) the financial resources and needs of the 10        child;11            (B) the financial resources and needs of a 12        surviving parent;13            (C) the standard of living the child would have 14        enjoyed had the death of the parent or parents not 15        resulted; and16            (D) the physical and emotional condition of the 17        child and the child's educational needs.18        (3) Income.19            (A) As used in this Section, "gross income" means 20        the total of all income from all sources, except 21        "gross income" does not include (i) benefits received 22        from means-tested public assistance programs, 23        including, but not limited to, Temporary Assistance 24        for Needy Families, Supplemental Security Income, and 25        the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program or (ii) 26        benefits and income received for other children in the   HB1049- 14 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        household, including, but not limited to, child 2        support, survivor benefits, and foster care payments. 3        "Gross income" includes maintenance treated as taxable 4        income for federal income tax purposes to the payee 5        and received pursuant to a court order in the pending 6        proceedings or any other proceedings and shall be 7        included in the payee's gross income for purposes of 8        calculating the child support obligation.9            (B) As used in this Section, "net income" means 10        gross income minus either the standardized tax amount 11        calculated pursuant to subparagraph (C) or the 12        individualized tax amount calculated pursuant to 13        subparagraph (D), and minus any adjustments pursuant 14        to subparagraph (F). The standardized tax amount shall 15        be used unless the requirements for an individualized 16        tax amount set forth in subparagraph (E) are met. "Net 17        income" includes maintenance not includable in the 18        gross taxable income of the payee for federal income 19        tax purposes under a court order in the pending 20        proceedings or any other proceedings and shall be 21        included in the payee's net income for purposes of 22        calculating the child support obligation.23            (C) As used in this Section, "standardized tax 24        amount" means the total of federal and State income 25        taxes for a single person claiming the standard tax 26        deduction, one personal exemption, and the applicable   HB1049- 15 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        number of dependency exemptions for the minor child or 2        children of the parties, and Social Security and 3        Medicare tax calculated at the Federal Insurance 4        Contributions Act rate.5            (D) As used in this Section, "individualized tax 6        amount" means the aggregate of the following taxes:7                (I) federal income tax (properly calculated 8            withholding or estimated payments);9                (II) State income tax (properly calculated 10            withholding or estimated payments); and11                (III) Social Security or self-employment tax, 12            if applicable (or, if none, mandatory retirement 13            contributions required by law or as a condition of 14            employment) and Medicare tax calculated at the 15            Federal Insurance Contributions Act rate.16            (E) In lieu of a standardized tax amount, a 17        determination of an individualized tax amount may be 18        made under item (I), (II), or (III). If an 19        individualized tax amount determination is made under 20        this subparagraph, all relevant tax attributes 21        (including filing status, allocation of dependency 22        exemptions, and whether a party is to claim the use of 23        the standard deduction or itemized deductions for 24        federal income tax purposes) shall be as the parties 25        agree or as the court determines. To determine a 26        party's reported income, the court may order the party   HB1049- 16 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        to complete an Internal Revenue Service Form 4506-T, 2        Request for Tax Transcript.3                (I) Agreement. Irrespective of whether the 4            parties agree on any other issue before the court, 5            if they jointly stipulate for the record the 6            parties' concurrence on a computation method for 7            the individualized tax amount that is different 8            from the method set forth under subparagraph (D), 9            the stipulated method shall be used by the court 10            unless the court rejects the proposed stipulated 11            method for good cause.12                (II) Summary hearing. If the court determines 13            child support in a summary hearing under Section 14            501 and an eligible party opts in to the 15            individualized tax amount method under this item 16            (II), the individualized tax amount shall be 17            determined by the court on the basis of 18            information contained in one or both parties' 19            Supreme Court approved financial affidavit and 20            relevant supporting documents under applicable 21            court rules. No party, however, is eligible to opt 22            in unless the party, under applicable court rules, 23            has served the other party with the required 24            Supreme Court approved financial affidavit and has 25            substantially produced supporting documents 26            required by the applicable court rules.  HB1049- 17 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1                (III) Evidentiary hearing. If the court 2            determines child support in an evidentiary 3            hearing, whether for purposes of a temporary order 4            or at the conclusion of a proceeding, item (II) 5            does not apply. In each such case (unless item (I) 6            governs), the individualized tax amount shall be 7            as determined by the court on the basis of the 8            record established.9            (F) Adjustments to income.10                (I) Multifamily adjustment. If the defendant 11            is also legally responsible for support of the 12            defendant's own child and not subject to the 13            present proceeding, there shall be an adjustment 14            to net income as follows:15                    (i) Multifamily adjustment with court 16                order. The court shall deduct from the 17                defendant's net income the amount of child 18                support actually paid by the defendant 19                pursuant to a support order unless the court 20                makes a finding that it would cause economic 21                hardship to the child.22                    (ii) Multifamily adjustment without court 23                order. Upon the request or application of a 24                defendant actually supporting a presumed, 25                acknowledged, or adjudicated child living in 26                or outside of that defendant's household,   HB1049- 18 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1                there shall be an adjustment to child support. 2                The court shall deduct from the defendant's 3                net income the amount of financial support 4                actually paid by the defendant for the child 5                or 75% of the support the defendant should pay 6                under the child support guidelines (before 7                this adjustment), whichever is less, unless 8                the court makes a finding that it would cause 9                economic hardship to the child. The adjustment 10                shall be calculated using the defendant's 11                income alone.12        (3.1) Business income. For purposes of calculating 13    child support, "net business income from the operation of 14    a business" means gross receipts minus ordinary and 15    necessary expenses required to carry on the trade or 16    business. As used in this paragraph, "business" includes, 17    but is not limited to, sole proprietorships, closely held 18    corporations, partnerships, other flow-through business 19    entities, and self-employment. The court shall apply the 20    following:21            (A) The accelerated component of depreciation and 22        any business expenses determined either judicially or 23        administratively to be inappropriate or excessive 24        shall be excluded from the total of ordinary and 25        necessary business expenses to be deducted in the 26        determination of net business income from gross   HB1049- 19 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        business income.2            (B) Any item of reimbursement or in-kind payment 3        received by a defendant from a business, including, 4        but not limited to, a company car, reimbursed meals, 5        free housing, or a housing allowance, shall be counted 6        as income if not otherwise included in the defendant's 7        gross income, if the item is significant in amount and 8        reduces personal expenses.9        (3.2) Unemployment or underemployment. If the 10    defendant is voluntarily unemployed or underemployed, 11    child support shall be calculated based on a determination 12    of potential income. A determination of potential income 13    shall be made by determining employment potential and 14    probable earnings level based on the defendant's work 15    history, occupational qualifications, prevailing job 16    opportunities, the ownership by a defendant of a 17    substantial non-income producing asset, and earnings 18    levels in the community. If there is insufficient work 19    history to determine employment potential and probable 20    earnings level, there shall be a rebuttable presumption 21    that the defendant's potential income is 75% of the most 22    recent United States Department of Health and Human 23    Services Federal Poverty Guidelines for a family of one 24    person.25        (3.3) Rebuttable presumption in favor of guidelines. 26    There is a rebuttable presumption in any judicial or   HB1049- 20 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1    administrative proceeding for child support that the 2    amount of the child support obligation that would result 3    from the application of the child support guidelines is 4    the correct amount of child support.5        (3.3a) Minimum child support obligation. There is a 6    rebuttable presumption that a minimum child support 7    obligation of $40 per month, per child, will be entered 8    for a defendant who has actual or imputed gross income at 9    or less than 75% of the most recent United States 10    Department of Health and Human Services Federal Poverty 11    Guidelines for a family of one person, with a maximum 12    total child support obligation for the defendant of $120 13    per month to be divided equally among all of the 14    defendant's children.15        (3.3b) Zero dollar child support order. For a 16    defendant with no gross income who receives only 17    means-tested assistance, or who cannot work due to a 18    medically proven disability, incarceration, or 19    institutionalization, there is a rebuttable presumption 20    that the $40 per month minimum support order is 21    inapplicable and a zero dollar order shall be entered.22        (3.4) Deviation factors. In any action to establish or 23    modify child support, whether pursuant to a temporary or 24    final administrative or court order, the child support 25    guidelines shall be used as a rebuttable presumption for 26    the establishment or modification of the amount of child   HB1049- 21 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1    support. The court may deviate from the child support 2    guidelines if the application would be inequitable, 3    unjust, or inappropriate. Any deviation from the 4    guidelines shall be accompanied by written findings by the 5    court specifying the reasons for the deviation and the 6    presumed amount under the child support guidelines without 7    a deviation. These reasons may include:8            (A) extraordinary medical expenditures necessary 9        to preserve the life or health of a surviving parent or 10        a child subject to the child support order;11            (B) additional expenses incurred for a child 12        subject to the child support order who has special 13        medical, physical, or developmental needs; and14            (C) any other factor the court determines should 15        be applied upon a finding that the application of the 16        child support guidelines would be inappropriate, after 17        considering the best interests of the child.18        (3.5) Income in excess of the schedule of basic child 19    support obligation. A court may use its discretion to 20    determine child support if the combined adjusted net 21    income exceeds the highest level of the schedule of basic 22    child support obligation, except that the basic child 23    support obligation shall not be less than the highest 24    level of combined net income set forth in the schedule of 25    basic child support obligation.26        (3.6) Extracurricular activities and school expenses.   HB1049- 22 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1    The court, in its discretion, in addition to the basic 2    child support obligation, may order the defendant to 3    contribute to the reasonable school and extracurricular 4    activity expenses incurred which are intended to enhance 5    the educational, athletic, social, or cultural development 6    of the child.7        (3.7) Child care expenses. The court, in its 8    discretion, in addition to the basic child support 9    obligation, may order the defendant to contribute to the 10    reasonable child care expenses of the child. The child 11    care expenses shall be made payable directly to a party or 12    directly to the child care provider at the time of child 13    care services.14            (A) "Child care expenses" means actual expenses 15        reasonably necessary to enable a parent or nonparent 16        custodian to be employed, to attend educational or 17        vocational training programs to improve employment 18        opportunities, or to search for employment. "Child 19        care expenses" includes deposits for securing 20        placement in a child care program and the cost of 21        before and after school care and camps when school is 22        not in session. A child's special needs shall be a 23        consideration in determining reasonable child care 24        expenses.25            (B) Child care expenses shall be prorated in 26        proportion to each party's percentage share of   HB1049- 23 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        combined net income, and may be added to the basic 2        child support obligation if not paid directly by each 3        party to the provider of child care services. The 4        obligor's and obligee's portion of actual child care 5        expenses shall appear in the support order. If 6        allowed, the value of the federal income tax credit 7        for child care shall be subtracted from the actual 8        cost to determine the net child care costs.9            (C) The amount of child care expenses shall be 10        adequate to obtain reasonable and necessary child 11        care. The actual child care expenses shall be used to 12        calculate the child care expenses, if available. When 13        actual child care expenses vary, the actual child care 14        expenses may be averaged over the most recent 12-month 15        period. When a party is temporarily unemployed or 16        temporarily not attending educational or vocational 17        training programs, future child care expenses shall be 18        based upon prospective expenses to be incurred upon 19        return to employment or educational or vocational 20        training programs.21            (D) An order for child care expenses may be 22        modified upon a showing of a substantial change in 23        circumstances. The party incurring child care expenses 24        shall notify the other party within 14 days of any 25        change in the amount of child care expenses that would 26        affect the annualized child care amount as determined   HB1049- 24 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        in the support order.2        (4) Health care.3            (A) A portion of the basic child support 4        obligation is intended to cover basic ordinary 5        out-of-pocket medical expenses. The court, in its 6        discretion, in addition to the basic child support 7        obligation, shall also provide for the child's current 8        and future medical needs by the defendant to initiate 9        health insurance coverage for the child through 10        currently effective health insurance policies held by 11        the parent, purchase one or more or all health, 12        dental, or vision insurance policies for the child, or 13        provide for the child's current and future medical 14        needs through some other manner.15            (B) The court, in its discretion, may order the 16        defendant to contribute to the reasonable health care 17        needs of the child not covered by insurance, 18        including, but not limited to, unreimbursed medical, 19        dental, orthodontic, or vision expenses and any 20        prescription medication for the child not covered 21        under the child's health insurance.22            (C) If neither the child nor children have access 23        to appropriate private health insurance coverage, the 24        court may order the defendant to:25                (I) provide health insurance coverage at any 26            time it becomes available at a reasonable cost; or  HB1049- 25 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1                (II) apply for public health insurance 2            coverage for the child and pay a reasonable amount 3            of the cost of health insurance for the child.4        The order may also provide that any time private 5        health insurance coverage is available at a reasonable 6        cost it will be provided instead of cash medical 7        support. As used in this Section, "cash medical 8        support" means an amount ordered to be paid toward the 9        cost of health insurance provided by a public entity 10        or by another person through employment or otherwise 11        or for other medical costs not covered by insurance.12            (D) The amount to be added to the basic child 13        support obligation shall be the actual amount of the 14        total health insurance premium that is attributable to 15        the child who is the subject of the order. If this 16        amount is not available or cannot be verified, the 17        total cost of the health insurance premium shall be 18        divided by the total number of persons covered by the 19        policy. The cost per person derived from this 20        calculation shall be multiplied by the number of 21        children who are the subject of the order and who are 22        covered under the health insurance policy. This amount 23        shall be added to the basic child support obligation 24        and shall be allocated between the parties in 25        proportion to the parties' respective net incomes.26            (E) After the health insurance premium for the   HB1049- 26 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        child is added to the basic child support obligation 2        and allocated between the parties in proportion to the 3        parties' respective incomes for child support 4        purposes, if the defendant is paying the premium, the 5        amount calculated for the obligee's share of the 6        health insurance premium for the child shall be 7        deducted from the defendant's share of the total child 8        support obligation. If the obligee is paying for 9        private health insurance for the child, the child 10        support obligation shall be increased by the 11        defendant's share of the premium payment. The 12        defendant's and obligee's portion of health insurance 13        costs shall appear in the support order.14            (F) Prior to allowing the health insurance 15        adjustment, the defendant requesting the adjustment 16        must submit proof that the child has been enrolled in a 17        health insurance plan and must submit proof of the 18        cost of the premium. The court shall require the 19        defendant receiving the adjustment to annually submit 20        proof of continued coverage of the child to the 21        obligee, or as designated by the court.22            (G) A reasonable cost for providing health 23        insurance coverage for the child may not exceed 5% of 24        the defendant's gross income. A defendant with a net 25        income below 133% of the most recent United States 26        Department of Health and Human Services Federal   HB1049- 27 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1        Poverty Guidelines or whose child is covered by 2        Medicaid based on the defendant's income may not be 3        ordered to contribute toward or provide private 4        coverage, unless private coverage is obtainable 5        without any financial contribution by the defendant.6            (H) If dental or vision insurance is included as 7        part of the employer's medical plan, the coverage 8        shall be maintained for the child. If not included in 9        the employer's medical plan, adding the dental or 10        vision insurance for the child is at the discretion of 11        the court.12        (5) If the net income cannot be determined because of 13    default or any other reason, the court shall order support 14    in an amount considered reasonable in the particular case. 15    The final order in all cases shall state the support level 16    in dollar amounts. However, if the court finds that the 17    child support amount cannot be expressed exclusively as a 18    dollar amount because all or a portion of the defendant's 19    net income is uncertain as to source, time of payment, or 20    amount, the court may order a percentage amount of support 21    in addition to a specific dollar amount and enter such 22    other orders as may be necessary to determine and enforce, 23    on a timely basis, the applicable support ordered.24        (6) If (i) the defendant was properly served with a 25    request for discovery of financial information relating to 26    the defendant's ability to provide child support, (ii) the   HB1049- 28 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1    defendant failed to comply with the request, despite 2    having been ordered to do so by the court, and (iii) the 3    defendant is not present at the hearing to determine 4    support despite having received proper notice, then any 5    relevant financial information concerning the defendant's 6    ability to provide child support that was obtained 7    pursuant to subpoena and proper notice shall be admitted 8    into evidence without the need to establish any further 9    foundation for its admission.10    (a-5) In an action to enforce an order for child support 11based on the defendant's failure to make support payments as 12required by the order, notice of proceedings to hold the 13defendant in contempt for that failure may be served on the 14defendant by personal service or by regular mail addressed to 15the last known address of the defendant. The last known 16address of the defendant may be determined from records of the 17clerk of the court, from the Federal Case Registry of Child 18Support Orders, or by any other reasonable means.19    (b) Failure to comply with an order to pay support shall be 20punishable as in other cases of contempt. In addition to other 21penalties provided by law the court may, after finding the 22defendant guilty of contempt, order that the defendant be:23        (1) placed on probation with such conditions of 24    probation as the court deems advisable;25        (2) sentenced to periodic imprisonment for a period 26    not to exceed 6 months; provided, however, that the court   HB1049- 29 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1    may permit the defendant to be released for periods of 2    time during the day or night to:3            (A) work; or4            (B) conduct a business or other self-employed 5        occupation.6    If a defendant who is found guilty of contempt for failure 7to comply with an order to pay support is a person who conducts 8a business or who is self-employed, the court in addition to 9other penalties provided by law may order that the defendant 10do one or more of the following: (i) provide to the court 11monthly financial statements showing income and expenses from 12the business or the self-employment; (ii) seek employment and 13report periodically to the court with a diary, listing, or 14other memorandum of his or her employment search efforts; or 15(iii) report to the Department of Employment Security for job 16search services to find employment that will be subject to 17withholding for child support.18    If there is a unity of interest and ownership sufficient 19to render no financial separation between a defendant and 20another person or persons or business entity, the court may 21pierce the ownership veil of the person, persons, or business 22entity to discover assets of the defendant held in the name of 23that person, those persons, or that business entity. The 24following circumstances are sufficient to authorize a court to 25order discovery of the assets of a person, persons, or 26business entity and to compel the application of any   HB1049- 30 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1discovered assets toward payment on the judgment for support:2        (1) the defendant and the person, persons, or business 3    entity maintain records together.4        (2) the defendant and the person, persons, or business 5    entity fail to maintain an arm's length relationship 6    between themselves with regard to any assets.7        (3) the defendant transfers assets to the person, 8    persons, or business entity with the intent to perpetrate 9    a fraud on the obligee.10    With respect to assets which are real property, no order 11entered under this paragraph shall affect the rights of bona 12fide purchasers, mortgagees, judgment creditors, or other lien 13holders who acquire their interests in the property prior to 14the time a notice of lis pendens pursuant to the Code of Civil 15Procedure or a copy of the order is placed of record in the 16office of the recorder of deeds for the county in which the 17real property is located.18    The court may also order in cases where the defendant is 90 19days or more delinquent in payment of support or has been 20adjudicated in arrears in an amount equal to 90 days 21obligation or more, that the defendant's Illinois driving 22privileges be suspended until the court determines that the 23defendant is in compliance with the order of support. The 24court may also order that the defendant be issued a family 25financial responsibility driving permit that would allow 26limited driving privileges for employment and medical purposes   HB1049- 31 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1in accordance with Section 7-702.1 of the Illinois Vehicle 2Code. The clerk of the circuit court shall certify the order 3suspending the driving privileges of the defendant or granting 4the issuance of a family financial responsibility driving 5permit to the Secretary of State on forms prescribed by the 6Secretary of State. Upon receipt of the authenticated 7documents, the Secretary of State shall suspend the 8defendant's driving privileges until further order of the 9court and shall, if ordered by the court, subject to the 10provisions of Section 7-702.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, 11issue a family financial responsibility driving permit to the 12defendant.13    In addition to the penalties or punishment that may be 14imposed under this Section, any person whose conduct 15constitutes a violation of Section 15 of the Non-Support 16Punishment Act may be prosecuted under the Non-Support 17Punishment Act, and a person convicted under the Non-Support 18Punishment Act may be sentenced in accordance with the 19Non-Support Punishment Act. The sentence may include, but need 20not be limited to, a requirement that the person perform 21community service under Section 50 of the Non-Support 22Punishment or participate in a work alternative program under 23Section 50 of the Non-Support Punishment. A person may not be 24required to participate in a work alternative program under 25Section 50 of the Non-Support Punishment Act if the person is 26currently participating in a work program pursuant to Section   HB1049- 32 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1505.1 of this Act.2    A support obligation, or any portion of a support 3obligation, which becomes due and remains unpaid as of the end 4of each month, excluding the child support that was due for 5that month to the extent that it was not paid in that month, 6shall accrue simple interest as set forth in Section 12-109 of 7the Code of Civil Procedure. An order for support shall 8contain a statement that a support obligation required under 9the order, or any portion of a support obligation required 10under the order, that becomes due and remains unpaid as of the 11end of each month, excluding the child support that was due for 12that month to the extent that it was not paid in that month, 13shall accrue simple interest as set forth in Section 12-109 of 14the Code of Civil Procedure. Failure to include the statement 15in the order for support does not affect the validity of the 16order or the accrual of interest as provided in this Section.17    (c) Any new or existing support order entered by the court 18under this Section shall be deemed to be a series of judgments 19against the person obligated to pay support thereunder, each 20such judgment to be in the amount of each payment or 21installment of support and each such judgment to be deemed 22entered as of the date the corresponding payment or 23installment becomes due under the terms of the support order. 24Each such judgment shall have the full force, effect, and 25attributes of any other judgment of this State, including the 26ability to be enforced. Notwithstanding any other State or   HB1049- 33 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1local law to the contrary, a lien arises by operation of law 2against the real and personal property of the defendant for 3each installment of overdue support owed by the defendant.4    (d) When child support is to be paid through the clerk of 5the court in a county of 500,000 inhabitants or less, the order 6shall direct the defendant to pay to the clerk, in addition to 7the child support payments, all fees imposed by the county 8board under paragraph (4) of subsection (bb) of Section 27.1a 9of the Clerks of Courts Act. When child support is to be paid 10through the clerk of the court in a county of more than 500,000 11but less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the order shall direct 12the defendant to pay to the clerk, in addition to the child 13support payments, all fees imposed by the county board under 14paragraph (4) of subsection (bb) of Section 27.2 of the Clerks 15of Courts Act. Unless paid pursuant to an Income Withholding 16Order or Notice for Support, the payment of the fee shall be by 17payment acceptable to the clerk and shall be made to the order 18of the clerk.19    (e) All orders for support, when entered or modified, 20shall include a provision requiring the defendant to notify 21the court and, in cases in which a party is receiving child and 22spouse services under Article X of the Illinois Public Aid 23Code, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, within 247 days, (i) of the name and address of any new employer of the 25defendant, (ii) whether the defendant has access to health 26insurance coverage through the employer or other group   HB1049- 34 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1coverage and, if so, the policy name and number and the names 2of persons covered under the policy, except only the initials 3of any covered minors shall be included, and (iii) of any new 4residential or mailing address or telephone number of the 5defendant. In any subsequent action to enforce a support 6order, upon a sufficient showing that a diligent effort has 7been made to ascertain the location of the defendant, service 8of process or provision of notice necessary in the case may be 9made at the last known address of the defendant in any manner 10expressly provided by the Code of Civil Procedure or this Act, 11which service shall be sufficient for purposes of due process.12    (f) An order for support shall include a date on which the 13current support obligation terminates. The termination date 14shall be no earlier than the date on which the child covered by 15the order will attain the age of 18. However, if the child will 16not graduate from high school until after attaining the age of 1718, then the termination date shall be no earlier than the 18earlier of the date on which the child's high school 19graduation will occur or the date on which the child will 20attain the age of 19. The order for support shall state that 21the termination date does not apply to any arrearage that may 22remain unpaid on that date. Nothing in this subsection shall 23be construed to prevent the court from modifying the order or 24terminating the order if the child is otherwise emancipated.25    (g) If there is an unpaid arrearage or delinquency (as 26those terms are defined in the Income Withholding for Support   HB1049- 35 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1Act) equal to at least one month's support obligation on the 2termination date stated in the order for support or, if there 3is no termination date stated in the order, on the date the 4child attains the age of majority or is otherwise emancipated, 5the periodic amount required to be paid for current support of 6that child immediately prior to that date shall automatically 7continue to be an obligation, not as current support but as 8periodic payment toward satisfaction of the unpaid arrearage 9or delinquency. The periodic payment shall be in addition to 10any periodic payment previously required for satisfaction of 11the arrearage or delinquency. The total periodic amount to be 12paid toward satisfaction of the arrearage or delinquency may 13be enforced and collected by any method provided by law for 14enforcement and collection of child support, including, but 15not limited to, income withholding under the Income 16Withholding for Support Act. Each order for support must 17contain a statement notifying the parties of the requirements 18of this subsection. Failure to include the statement in the 19order for support does not affect the validity of the order or 20the operation of the provisions of this subsection with regard 21to the order. This subsection shall not be construed to 22prevent or affect the establishment or modification of an 23order for support of a minor child or the establishment or 24modification of an order for support of a nonminor child or 25educational expenses under Section 513.26    (h) An order entered under this Section shall include a   HB1049- 36 -LRB104 03160 JRC 13181 b1provision requiring a defendant to report to the surviving 2parent or nonparent custodian and to the clerk of court within 310 days each time he or she obtains new employment, and each 4time his or her employment is terminated for any reason. The 5report shall be in writing and shall, in the case of new 6employment, include the name and address of the new employer. 7Failure to report new employment or the termination of current 8employment, if coupled with nonpayment of support for a period 9in excess of 60 days, is indirect criminal contempt. For an 10arrest for failure to report new employment, bond shall be set 11in the amount of the child support that should have been paid 12during the period of unreported employment. An order entered 13under this Section shall also include a provision requiring 14either the defendant and the obligee to advise the other of a 15change in residence within 5 days of the change except when the 16court finds that the physical, mental, or emotional health of 17a party or that of a child, or both, would be seriously 18endangered by disclosure of the party's address.19    (i) The court does not lose the powers of contempt, 20driver's license suspension, or other child support 21enforcement mechanisms, including, but not limited to, 22criminal prosecution as set forth in this Act, upon the 23emancipation of the minor child.